Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 16 The Rhode Island Limited-Liability Company Act
7-16-9.
Name — Fictitious business names.

The name of each limited-liability company as set forth in its articles of organization:

Shall end with either the words “limited-liability company” or the upper or lower case letters “l.l.c.” with or without punctuation, or, if organized as a low-profit, limited-liability company, shall end with either the words “low-profit, limited-liability company” or the abbreviation “L3C” or “13c”;

Shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from:

The name of any corporation, non-business corporation or other association, limited partnership or domestic or foreign limited-liability company organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in, this state; or

Any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title, subject to the following:

This provision shall not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, non-business corporation, or other association, the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

Any domestic or foreign limited-liability company organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in, this state may transact business in this state under a fictitious name provided that it files a fictitious business name statement in accordance with this subsection.

A fictitious business name statement shall be filed with the secretary of state and shall be executed by an authorized person of the domestic limited-liability company or by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of the organization of the foreign limited-liability company and shall set forth:

The fictitious business name to be used; and

The name of the applicant limited-liability company, the state or other jurisdiction in which the limited-liability company is organized and date of the limited-liability company’s organization.

The fictitious business name statement expires upon the filing of a statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name registered in accordance with this subsection or upon the dissolution of the applicant domestic limited-liability company or the cancellation of registration of the applicant foreign limited-liability company.

The statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name under this subsection shall be filed with the secretary of state, shall be executed in the same manner as provided in subdivision (2) above, and shall set forth:

The fictitious business name being abandoned;

The date on which the original fictitious business name statement being abandoned was filed; and

The information set forth in subsection (a)(2)(ii).

No domestic or foreign limited-liability company transacting business under a fictitious business name contrary to the provisions of this section, or its assignee, may maintain any action upon or on account of any contract made, or transaction had, in the fictitious business name in any court of the state until a fictitious business name statement has been filed in accordance with this section.

No limited-liability company may be permitted to transact business under a fictitious business name pursuant to this section that is the same as the name of any corporation, limited partnership or domestic or foreign limited-liability company organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in, this state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, non-business corporation, or other association, the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of revocation.

Words or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

A filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be collected by the secretary of state for each statement filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 9; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 9; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.

7-16-10.
Reservation of name — Transfer of reserved name.

The exclusive right to use a specified name for a domestic or foreign limited-liability company may be reserved by:

A person who intends to organize a domestic limited-liability company;

A domestic limited-liability company or foreign limited-liability company registered in this state which, in either case, proposes to change its name;

A foreign limited-liability company that intends to register in this state; or

Any person intending to organize a foreign limited-liability company and intending to have it registered in this state and adopt that name.

A person may reserve a specified name by filing a signed application with the secretary of state and, if the secretary of state finds that the name is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for one hundred twenty (120) days for the exclusive use of the applicant.

The exclusive right to use a reserved name may be transferred to another person by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer which specifies the name and address of the transferee and is signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-11.
Resident agent.

Each domestic or foreign registered limited-liability company shall have a resident agent for service of process on the limited-liability company who shall be either:

An individual resident of this state; or

A corporation, limited partnership, or limited-liability company, and in each case either domestic or one authorized to transact business in this state.

A domestic or foreign registered limited-liability company may change its resident agent or the address of its resident agent by filing with the secretary of state a statement signed by any authorized person that authorizes the change.

A change of a resident agent or address of the resident agent for a domestic or foreign registered limited-liability company under this subsection is effective when the secretary of state accepts the statement for filing.

A resident agent that changes address in the state shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the change of address signed by the resident agent or on the resident agent’s behalf.

The statement shall include:

The name of the limited-liability company for which the change is effective;

The old and new addresses of the resident agent; and

The date on which the change is effective.

The change of address of the resident agent is effective when the secretary of state accepts the statement for filing.

A resident agent may resign by filing with the secretary of state a counterpart or photocopy of the signed resignation, together with a statement that the resignation has been delivered or sent to the limited-liability company.

Unless a later time is specified in the resignation, it is effective thirty (30) days after it is filed.

The secretary of state is appointed the agent of the domestic limited-liability company for service of process if no resident agent has been appointed, if the resident agent’s authority has been revoked, or if the resident agent cannot be found or served following the exercise of reasonable diligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-12.
Amendment and restatement of articles of organization.

The articles of organization shall be amended when:

There is a change in the name of the limited-liability company;

A company that did not previously have managers designates managers, or a company that previously did have managers is to be managed by its members; or

There is a change in the manager of record.

The articles of organization may be amended at any time and in any respect that is desired, as long as the articles of organization, as amended, contain only those provisions as are lawful under this chapter.

The articles of organization may be restated at any time. Any restatement may include additional amendments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 137, § 3, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 138, § 3, effective January 1, 2022.

7-16-13.
Certificates of correction.

If any document filed with the secretary of state under this chapter contains any typographical error, error of transcription or other technical error or has been defectively executed, the document may be corrected by filing a certificate of correction.

A certificate of correction shall set forth:

The title of the document being corrected;

The name of each party to the document being corrected;

The date that the document being corrected was filed; and

The provision in the document as previously filed and as corrected and, if execution of the document was defective, the manner in which it was defective.

A certificate of correction may not make any other change or amendment that would not have complied in all respects with the requirements of this chapter at the time the document being corrected was filed.

A certificate of correction shall be executed in the same manner in which the document being corrected was required to be executed.

A certificate of correction may not:

Change the effective date of the document being corrected; or

Affect any right or liability accrued or incurred before its filing, except that any right or liability accrued or incurred by reason of the error or defect being corrected shall be extinguished by the filing if the person having the right or liability has not detrimentally relied on the original document.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-14.
Management by members.

Unless the articles of organization or a written operating agreement provide for management by or under the authority of one or more managers in accordance with §

7-16-15

, the business and affairs of the limited-liability company shall be managed by the members. If management is vested in the members:

The members are deemed to be managers for purposes of applying the provisions of this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise; and

Each of the members has the power and authority and is subject to all duties and liabilities of managers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5.

7-16-15.
Managers.

The articles of organization or a written operating agreement may deny, restrict or enlarge the management rights and duties of any member or group or class of member and may provide that the business and affairs of the limited-liability company shall be managed by or under the authority of one or more managers who may, but need not be, members.

The articles of organization or written operating agreement may prescribe qualifications for managers.

The number of managers may be specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of organization or written operating agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-16.
Election and removal of managers.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement:

Election of managers to fill initial positions or vacancies shall be by majority vote of the members.

Any or all managers may be removed, with or without cause, by majority vote of the members.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-17.
Duties of managers.

A manager shall discharge his or her managerial duties in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a similar position would use under the circumstances, and in the manner the manager reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the limited-liability company.

In discharging his or her duties, a manager is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more employees of the limited-liability company who the manager reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the manager reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of managers of which the manager is not a member if the manager reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

A manager is not acting in good faith if the manager has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

A manager is not liable for any action taken as a manager, or any failure to take any action, if the manager performed the duties of his or her office in compliance with this section.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, every manager must account to the limited-liability company and hold as trustee for the limited-liability company any profit or benefit he or she derived without the informed consent of the members or a majority of the disinterested managers from any transaction connected with the conduct or winding up of the limited-liability company or from any personal use by the manager of the limited-liability company’s property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-18.
Limitation of liability of managers.

Subject to subsection (b), the articles of organization or operating agreement may eliminate or limit the personal liability of a manager to the limited-liability company or to its members for monetary damages for breach of any duty provided for in §

7-16-17

.

No provision permitted under subsection (a) limits or eliminates the liability of a manager for:

Breach of the manager’s duty of loyalty to the limited-liability company or its members;

Acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

The liability imposed pursuant to the provisions of §

7-16-32

; or

Any transaction from which the manager derived an improper personal benefit, unless the transaction was with the informed consent of the members or a majority of the disinterested managers. No provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a manager will be effective with respect to causes of action arising prior to the inclusion of the provision in the articles of organization or operating agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-19.
Action by managers.

If the business and affairs of the limited-liability company is managed by or under the authority of more than one manager under §

7-16-15

, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the articles of organization or operating agreement, the managers shall act by majority vote, with each manager being entitled to one vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-20.
Agency power of managers.

Every manager is an agent of the limited-liability company for the purpose of its business and affairs, and the act of every manager, including the execution in the limited-liability company’s name of any instrument for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business and affairs of the limited-liability company that the manager manages, binds the limited-liability company unless:

The act is in contravention of the articles of organization or this chapter, or

The manager acting otherwise lacks the authority to act for the limited-liability company and the person with whom the manager is dealing has knowledge of the fact that the manager has no authority.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, members of a limited-liability company whose business and affairs is managed by or under the authority of one (1) or more managers pursuant to §

7-16-15

are not agents of the limited-liability company and have no authority to bind the limited-liability company unless they are also managers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5.

7-16-21.
Voting rights of members.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, the members of a limited-liability company, to the extent their membership interests have not been assigned, are entitled to vote in proportion to the capital value of the membership interests that have not been assigned.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, the affirmative vote of members entitled to vote, representing a majority of the capital values of all membership interests that have not been assigned, are required to approve the following matters:

The dissolution and winding up of the limited-liability company;

The sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, pledge or other transfer of all or substantially all of the assets of the limited-liability company;

The merger or consolidation of the limited-liability company with another person; and

A transaction involving an actual or potential conflict of interest between a manager and the limited-liability company;

An amendment to the articles of organization or operating agreement; and

Any restatement of the articles of organization that includes an additional amendment.

Any action required or permitted to be taken by the members or managers by this chapter, the articles of organization or operating agreement may be taken without a meeting if all the members entitled to vote or all the managers consent to it in writing.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement and except for actions pursuant to subsections (b)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, any action required or permitted to be taken by vote of the members may be taken without a meeting on the written consent of less than all the members entitled to vote on it, if the members who consent would be entitled to cast at least the minimum number of votes that would be required to take the action at a meeting at which all members entitled to vote on it are present.

Prompt notice of the action shall be given to all members who would have been entitled to vote on the action if the meeting were held.

Any action taken pursuant to this section has the same effect for all purposes as if the action had been taken at a meeting of the members.

The articles of organization or operating agreement may provide for any other voting rights of members.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-22.
Records and information.

Each limited-liability company shall keep at its principal office the following:

A current list of the full name and last known business address of each member and manager;

Copies of records that would enable a member to determine the capital values and the relative voting rights of the members;

A copy of the articles of organization and any restatements of the articles and amendments;

Executed copies of any powers of attorney pursuant to which any certificate has been executed;

Copies of the limited-liability company’s federal, state and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the five most recent years;

A copy of any written operating agreement;

Any written records of proceedings of the members or managers; and

Copies of any financial statements of the limited-liability company for the five most recent years.

A member may:

At the member’s own expense, inspect and copy any limited-liability company records required to be kept under this section upon reasonable request during ordinary business hours; and

Obtain from time to time, upon reasonable request, information regarding the state of the business and financial condition of the limited-liability company.

The current list of names and addresses of the members shall be made available to the secretary of state, the director of the department of business regulation, or the attorney general, as applicable, within five (5) business days of receipt of a written request by the secretary, director, or attorney general stating that the information is required in connection with an investigatory or enforcement proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5.

7-16-23.
Liability of members and managers.

A member or manager of a limited-liability company is not liable for the obligations of the limited-liability company solely by reason of being a member or manager.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-24.
Contributions to capital.

The contribution of a member to a limited-liability company must be a capital contribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-25.
Liability for contribution.

A promise by a member to make a capital contribution to the limited-liability company is not enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the member.

Except as provided in the operating agreement, a member’s obligation to make his or her capital contribution is not excused because of death, disability or other reason.

If a member does not make a capital contribution of property or services as and when promised, the member is obligated, at the option of the limited-liability company, to contribute cash equal to that portion of the value of the capital contribution that has not been made.

Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, the obligation of a member to make a capital contribution may be compromised only with the unanimous consent of the members.

Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited-liability company who extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on that obligation after the member signs a writing that reflects the obligation and before the compromise may enforce the original obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-26.
Sharing of profits and losses.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or the operating agreement, the profits and losses of a limited-liability company shall be allocated to each member on the basis of the member’s capital value.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-27.
Sharing of distributions.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, distributions of cash or other assets of a limited-liability company shall be allocated to each member on the basis of the member’s capital value.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-28.
Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this chapter, a member is entitled to receive distributions from a limited-liability company before the withdrawal of the member from the limited-liability company and before the dissolution and winding up of the limited-liability company to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events upon which the members unanimously agree or as provided in the operating agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-29.
Distributions upon withdrawal.

Upon the withdrawal of a member, except as otherwise provided in writing in an operating agreement, the withdrawn member and his or her legal representatives, successors and assigns do not have the right to receive any distribution by reason of the withdrawal but have only the rights of an assignee to receive distributions as to the withdrawn member’s interest during any continuation of the business of the limited-liability company and upon completion of winding up less any damages recoverable against the withdrawn member if the event of withdrawal violated the limited-liability company’s operating agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5.

7-16-30.
Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in the operating agreement:

A member has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited-liability company in any form other than cash; and

No member may be compelled to accept from a limited-liability company a distribution of any asset in kind to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the member exceeds the percentage of that asset which is equal to the percentage in which the member shares distributions from the limited-liability company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-31.
Restrictions on making distributions.

No distribution may be made to a member if, after giving effect to the distribution:

The limited-liability company would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business; or

The limited-liability company’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus, unless the operating agreement provides otherwise, the amount that would be needed, if the limited-liability company were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights of other members upon dissolution that are superior to the rights of the member receiving the distribution.

The limited-liability company may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (a) on:

Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable under the circumstances; or

A fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

The effect of a distribution under subsection (a) is measured as of:

The date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within one hundred and twenty (120) days after the date of authorization; or

The date payment is made if it occurs more than one hundred and twenty (120) days after the date of authorization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-32.
Liability upon wrongful distribution.

A member or manager who votes for or assents to a distribution in violation of the operating agreement or of §

7-16-31

is personally liable to the limited-liability company for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating the operating agreement or §

7-16-31

.

Each member or manager held liable under subsection (a) for an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution:

From each other member or manager who could be held liable under subsection (a) for the unlawful distribution; and

From each member for the amount the member received knowing that the distribution was made in violation of the operating agreement or §

7-16-31

.

A proceeding under this section is barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the effect of the distribution is measured under §

7-16-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-33.
Right to distribution.

Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, at the time a member becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited-liability company with respect to the distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-34.
Nature of membership interest.

A membership interest is personal property. A member has no interest in specific limited-liability company property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-35.
Assignment of membership interest.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or a written operating agreement:

A membership interest is assignable in whole or in part;

An assignment of a membership interest does not of itself dissolve a limited-liability company or entitle the assignee to participate in the management and affairs of the limited-liability company or to become a member or to exercise any rights or powers of a member;

An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distributions to which the assignor would be entitled; and

A member ceases to be a member and to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member on assignment of all of the member’s membership interest.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or an operating agreement, the pledge of or granting of a security interest, lien or other encumbrance in or against any or all of the membership interest of a member is not deemed an assignment of a membership interest.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or an operating agreement and except to the extent provided in a written agreement signed by an assignee, until an assignee of a membership interest becomes a member, the assignee has no liability as a member solely as a result of the assignment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-36.
Right of assignee to become a member.

Except as otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, an assignee of an interest in a limited-liability company may become a member only if the other members unanimously consent. The consent of a member may be evidenced in any manner specified in an operating agreement, but in the absence of specification, consent is evidenced by a written instrument, dated and signed by the member, or evidenced by a vote taken at a meeting of the members called in accordance with the operating agreement and maintained with the records of the limited-liability company.

An assignee who becomes a member has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a member under the articles of organization, any operating agreement and this chapter.

An assignee who becomes a member is liable for any obligations of the assignor to make contributions and to return distributions under this chapter.

Whether or not an assignee of a membership interest becomes a member, the assignor is not released from the assignor’s liability to the limited-liability company under §

7-16-25

and §

7-16-32

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-37.
Rights of judgment creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a member, the court may charge the membership interest of the member with payment of the unsatisfied amount of judgment with interest. To the extent charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the membership interest. This chapter does not deprive any member of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to that member’s membership interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-38.
Powers of estate of a member.

If a member who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges the member to be incompetent to manage the member’s person or property, the member’s executor, administrator, guardian, conservator or other legal representative may exercise all of the member’s rights for the purpose of settling the estate or administering property, including any power under the articles of organization or a written operating agreement permitting an assignee to become a member.

If a member is a corporation, partnership, limited partnership, domestic or foreign limited-liability company, trust, estate, association or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that member may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-39.
Dissolution.

A limited-liability company is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

At any time specified in the articles of organization;

An event specified in the articles of organization or a written operating agreement to cause dissolution;

By action of members taken pursuant to §

7-16-21(b)(1)

;

On the written consent of a majority of the capital values of the remaining members after the death, withdrawal, expulsion, bankruptcy, or dissolution of a member, or the occurrence of any other event that terminates the continued membership of a member in the limited-liability company, unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or a written operating agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or a written operating agreement, on the death, withdrawal, expulsion, bankruptcy or dissolution of the last remaining member or any other event that terminates the continued membership of the last remaining member, unless within ninety (90) days the successor(s) in interest of the last remaining member and any assignees of the member’s interest and of any other member’s interest agree in writing to admit at least one (1) member to continue the business of the limited-liability company; or

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under §

7-16-40

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5.

7-16-40.
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or on behalf of a member, the superior court may decree dissolution of a limited-liability company whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the articles of organization or operating agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-41.
Revocation of certificate of organization or certificate of registration.

The certificate of organization or certificate of registration of a limited-liability company may be revoked by the secretary of state under the conditions prescribed in this section when it is established that:

The limited-liability company procured its articles of organization through fraud;

The limited-liability company has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

The limited-liability company has failed to file its annual report within the time required by this chapter, or with respect to any limited-liability company in good company standing on the records of the secretary of state on or after July 1, 2019, has failed to pay any required fees to the secretary of state when they have become due and payable, or the secretary of state has received notice from the division of taxation, in accordance with §

7-16-67.1

, that the limited-liability company has failed to pay any fees or taxes due this state;

The limited-liability company has failed for thirty (30) days to appoint and maintain a resident agent in this state as required by this chapter;

The limited-liability company has failed, after change of its resident agent, to file in the office of the secretary of state a statement of the change as required by this chapter;

The limited-liability company has failed to file in the office of the secretary of state any amendment to its articles of organization or certificate of registration or any articles of dissolution, cancellation of registration, merger, or consolidation as prescribed by this chapter; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted by the limited-liability company pursuant to this chapter.

No certificate of organization or certificate of registration of a limited-liability company shall be revoked by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state shall have given the limited-liability company notice thereof not less than sixty (60) days prior to such revocation by regular mail addressed to the resident agent in this state on file with the secretary of state’s office, which notice shall specify the basis for the revocation; provided, however, that if a prior mailing addressed to the address of the resident agent of the limited-liability company in this state currently on file with the secretary of state’s office has been returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, or if the revocation notice is returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, the secretary of state shall give notice as follows:

To the limited-liability company, domestic or foreign, at its principal office of record as shown in its most recent annual report, and no further notice shall be required; or

In the case of a limited-liability company that has not yet filed an annual report, then to the domestic limited-liability company at the principal office in the articles of organization or to the authorized person listed on the articles of organization, or to the foreign limited-liability company at the office required to be maintained by the limited-liability company in its state of organization, and no further notice shall be required; and

The limited-liability company fails prior to revocation to file the annual report, pay the fees or taxes, file the required statement of change of resident agent, file the articles of amendment or amendment to its registration or articles of dissolution, cancellation of registration, merger, or consolidation, or correct the misrepresentation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 26, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 268, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 376, § 2.